Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201477-3213
Act, how cited.

Sections 77-3201 to 77-3213 shall be known and may be cited
as the Land Reutilization Act.

Laws 1973, LB 73, § 13;

Laws 2008, LB710, § 6;

Laws 2013, LB97, § 28.